Utah statutes.
61-2b-27.   Professional conduct -- Uniform standards.
(1) (a)  A person licensed, certified, registered, or approved as an expert
witness under this chapter must comply with:
(i)  generally accepted standards of professional appraisal practice; and
(ii)  generally accepted ethical rules to be observed by a real estate
appraiser.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (1)(c), generally accepted standards of
professional appraisal practice are evidenced by the Uniform Standards of
Professional Appraisal Practice promulgated by the Appraisal Foundation.
(c)  After a public hearing held in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board:
(i)  shall adopt and may make modifications of or additions to the Uniform
Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice as the board considers
appropriate to comply with the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and
Enforcement Act of 1989; or
(ii)  may by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, exempt a person licensed, certified,
registered, or approved as an expert witness from complying with a provision
of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice for an activity
that the person engages in on behalf of a governmental entity.
(2)  The board shall schedule a public hearing pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter
3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for the purpose of deciding whether or
not the board should require a modified or supplemental standard or the
ethical rule to be observed by a person licensed, certified, registered, or
approved as an expert witness under this chapter if the Appraisal Standards
Board of the Appraisal Foundation:
(a) (i)  modifies the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;
(ii)  issues a supplemental appraisal standard which it considers appropriate
for:
(A)  a residential real estate appraiser; or
(B)  a general real estate appraiser; or
(iii)  issues an ethical rule to be observed by a real estate appraiser; and
(b)  requests the board to consider the adoption of the modified or
supplemental standard or ethical rule.
(3)  If, after the notice and public hearing described in Subsection (2), the
board finds that a modified or supplemental standard or the ethical rule
issued by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation is
appropriate for a person licensed, certified, registered, or approved as an
expert witness under this chapter, the board shall recommend a rule requiring
a person licensed, certified, registered, or approved as an expert witness
under this chapter to observe the modified or supplemental standard or the
ethical rule.
